Utah statutes.
31A-23a-208.   Producer and agency authority in health insurance exchange.

A producer or agency licensed under this chapter, with a line of authority that permits the producer or agency to sell, negotiate, or solicit accident and health insurance, is authorized to sell, negotiate, or solicit qualified health plans offered on an exchange that is:

(1)  operated in the state; or

(2)  operated in the state and certified by the United States Department of Health and Human Services as a:

(a)  state-based exchange under PPACA;

(b)  a federally facilitated exchange under PPACA; or

(c)  a partnership exchange under PPACA.



Enacted by Chapter 341, 2013 General Session

